Tennessee, session 114, SB1033.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-2-116(a), is amended by deleting
the second sentence and substituting:
At the governor's direction, state agencies, including, those charged with responsibilities
in connection with flood plain management; stream encroachment and flow regulation;
weather modification, including the intentional injection, release, or dispersion, by any
means, of chemicals, chemical compounds, substances, or apparatus within the borders
of this state into the atmosphere with the express purpose of affecting temperature,
weather, or the intensity of the sunlight; fire prevention and control; air quality; public
works; land use and land use planning; and construction standards, shall make studies
of emergency mitigation-related matters.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-201-122, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) It is an offense to:
(1) Intentionally inject, release, or disperse, by any means, chemicals,
chemical compounds, substances, or apparatus within the borders of this state
into the atmosphere with the express purpose of affecting temperature, weather,
or the intensity of the sunlight; or
(2) Supply or otherwise provide a person with the chemicals, chemical
compounds, substances, or apparatus required for the conduct described in
SB1033
002686
- 1 -

subdivision (a)(1) if the supplier or provider knows or has reason to believe that
the chemicals, chemical compounds, substances, or apparatus will be used for
such conduct.
(b) The attorney general and reporter and local district attorneys may investigate
a report of:
(1) A violation of subsection (a) if the report is deemed credible by a state
agency charged with responsibilities as described in § 58-2-116(a); or
(2) The occurrence of a harmful consequence of an emergency, as
described in § 58-2-116, if the attorney general and reporter or local district
attorney reasonably believes that weather modification has or might have taken
place.
(c)
(1) Notwithstanding § 68-201-112, a violation of subsection (a) is a Class
A misdemeanor.
(2) In addition to the penalty described in subdivision (c)(1), if the
department determines that a person violated subsection (a), then the
department shall assess a fine of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per
violation. For purposes of determining the applicable penalty under this
subdivision (c)(2), each instance of injecting, releasing, or dispersing chemicals,
chemical compounds, substances, or apparatus for the purposes described in
subdivision (a)(1), and each instance of supplying or otherwise providing the
chemicals, chemical compounds, substances, or apparatus in violation of
subdivision (a)(2), is a separate violation.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to conduct occurring on or after that date.
- 2 - 002686